Hawaii statutes.
[§551E‑35] Tangible personal
property. Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, language in a
power of attorney granting general authority with respect to tangible personal
property shall authorize the agent to:

(1) Demand, buy, receive, accept as a gift or as
security for an extension of credit, or otherwise acquire or reject ownership
or possession of tangible personal property or an interest in tangible personal
property;

(2) Sell; exchange; convey with or without covenants,
representations, or warranties; quitclaim; release; surrender; create a
security interest in; grant options concerning; lease; sublease; or otherwise
dispose of tangible personal property or an interest in tangible personal
property;

(3) Grant a security interest in tangible personal
property or an interest in tangible personal property as security to borrow
money or pay, renew, or extend the time of payment of a debt of the principal
or a debt guaranteed by the principal;

(4) Release, assign, satisfy, or enforce by litigation
or otherwise, a security interest, lien, or other claim on behalf of the
principal, with respect to tangible personal property or an interest in
tangible personal property;

(5) Manage or conserve tangible personal property or
an interest in tangible personal property on behalf of the principal,
including:

(A) Insuring against liability or casualty or
other loss;

(B) Obtaining or regaining possession of or
protecting the property or interest, by litigation or otherwise;

(C) Paying, assessing, compromising, or
contesting taxes or assessments or applying for and receiving refunds in
connection with taxes or assessments;

(D) Moving the property from place to place;

(E) Storing the property for hire or on a
gratuitous bailment; and

(F) Using and making repairs, alterations, or
improvements to the property; and

(6) Change the form of title of an interest in
tangible personal property. [L 2014, c 22, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next